src/closed-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GUHTENAI
 +Sg+Nom:nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8nai# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3jnai # ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4snai # ;
 +Sg+Com:X5jnnai # ;
 +Ess:nnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdnai# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jdenai # ;



! Declineable indefinites with normal case paradigms
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!splitting v- and c-final evensyll in two for NomEss, as usual.
LEXICON indef-a-even-v
 indefattr ;
 indefdecleven-v-ne ;
 indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indef-a-even-c
 indefattr ;
 indefdecleven-c-ne ;
 :a indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-obl
 indefdeclsgeven ;
 indefdeclpleven ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-v-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-c-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsgeven
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpleven
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON JUOBBAGOABBA
 +Sg+Nom:juobbá#goabbá K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá#goappá K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá#goappá# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:juoppá#goappá K ;
 +Sg+Ill:juobbái#goabbái K ;
 +Sg+Loc:juoppás#goappás K ;
 +Sg+Com:juoppáin#goappáin K ;
 +Ess:juobbán#goabbán K ;
 +Pl+Nom:juobbát#goabbát K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppájd#goappájd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppájd#goappájd# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:juoppájd#goappájd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:juobbájde#goabbájde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:juoppájn#goappájn K ;
 +Pl+Com:juoppájgujn#goappájgujn K ;

! Intermediate lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indef-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven ;

LEXICON indef-a-uneven-gahpir
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven-gahpir ;

LEXICON indefsg-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indu-sg ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven
 indu-sg ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg
 :X4 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;
 :X2 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven-gahpir
 indu-sg-gahpir ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg-gahpir
 indefdeclsguneven-ne ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indu-pl-gahpir
 indefdeclpluneven-n ;
 :i indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
 indef-sg-u-e ; !For eatnagin

! Suffix lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ne
 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-n
 +Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-e
 +Ess:in K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ag
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ilc
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc:in K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-n
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-obl
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON indefattr
 +Attr:0 K ;


! Multiword indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefmulti ! added this lexicon, because otherwise these would be in indefattr
feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:feara% mij K-son ;
feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc:feara% májd K-son ;
feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:feara% gij K-son ;
feara% mii+Pron+Indef:feara% ma oblintercas ;
feara% gii+Pron+Indef:feara% gea oblintercas ;

! some multiword prons, according to Nickel
!feara% mii iind ;
!feara% gii iind ;
mii% nu iind ;
gii% nu iind ;
makkár% nu iind ;
makkaráš% nu iind ;


! The indeclineable indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indeclindef
buot iind ;
buot:buot# NAMAT ;
gait:gajt iind ;
gait:gajt# NAMAT ;
eatnat iind ;
eatnat:eatnat# NAMAT ;
!fal iind ; ! cf. Nickel s. 126.
gallát iind ;
goabbat iind ;
goabbat:goabbat# NAMAT ;
goappaš iind ;
goappaš:goappaš# NAMAT ;
!goappašat iind ; ! thus both Nom and non-Nom. XXX.
guhtet iind ;
!ieš#guhtet iind ; !XXX Nom only
ieš#guhtet:ieš#guhtet# NAMAT ;
ihkinassii iind ;
juohke iind ;
juohke:juohke# NAMAT ;
ollu iind ;
vaikko iind ;


LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:0 K ;



! Separate lexica for exceptional entries
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON declindef-idiosync
! separate lexica for these entries:
! oktat
 earrás EARRAS ;
ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Nom:ieš#guhtet K ;
ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen:ieš#guđet K ;
ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen:ieš#guđet# NAMAT ;
ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc:ieš#guđet K ;
 simme+Pron+Indef:simme SIMME ; !SUB
 seamma+Pron+Indef:seamma SEAMMA ;
 seammá+Pron+Indef:seammá SEAMMA ;
 seamma+Pron+Indef+Attr:seamma # ;
 seammá+Pron+Indef+Attr:seammá # ; !SUB, dict says seamma ~ seammá (#seamma)
 juoga+Pron+Indef:juo JUOGA ;
 gal0le+Pron+Indef:gal'l GUOKTE ; !^N^
guktot+Pron+Indef:gukto indefdeclplcontr ;
! okta
! juoga mii
!oktahat         +       no      OKTAHAT => indefeven / Nom=aktahat / OKTAttr
!        OKTattr:n=oktahat, aktahat, oktat, aktat
!                o=ovttahat, ovttat
!hárvvis        +       a       indef-a-      uneven  hárve, hárvves
!hárvvis        +       a       indef-a-      contr   hárve, hárvves
!Some problematic ones, one form for nsg, one for the rest
!oktat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:oktat # ;
!oktat+Pron+Indef:ovttat # ;
!oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:oktahat # ;
!oktahat+Pron+Indef+:ovttahat # ;

LEXICON indefdeclplcontr ! so far guktot
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jn K ;

LEXICON EARRAS
 +Sg+Acc:a # ;
 +Sg+Gen:a # ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij # ;
 +Sg+Loc:is # ;
 +Sg+Loc:in # ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:in # ;
! Essive and plural ???

LEXICON SEAMMA
 +Sg+Nom: # ;
 +Sg+Acc: # ;
 +Sg+Gen: # ;
 +Sg+Gen:# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Ill:j # ;  ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
! +Sg+Loc:s # ; ! Let's settle for the Adv reading
 +Sg+Loc:n # ;  !SUB !SOUTH, well..., probably this one should Adv as well
 +Sg+Com:jn # ; ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
 +Pl+Nom:t # ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd # ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd # ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd# NAMAT ;

LEXICON SIMME !SUB
 +Sg+Nom: # ;
 +Sg+Acc: # ;
 +Sg+Gen: # ;
 +Sg+Ill:j # ;
 +Sg+Loc:n # ;
 +Sg+Com:jn # ;
 +Pl+Nom:t # ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd # ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd # ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd# NAMAT ;



LEXICON JUOGA
 +Sg+Nom:ga # ;
 +Sg+Acc:ga # ;
 +Sg+Acc:jdá # ;
 +Sg+Acc:jddá # ;
 +Sg+Acc:jaaájd # ;
 +Sg+Gen:ga # ;
 +Sg+Gen:ga# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Ill:sat # ;
 +Sg+Loc:stá # ;
 +Sg+Com:jdájn # ;
 +Ess:nin # ;
 +Attr:da # ;






! Subjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Cs

 +CS:0 # ;





! Conjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Conjunction

ahte Cc ; ! In expressions like "heajut ahte heajut"
ja  Cc ;
ja/dahje Cc ;
dahe Cc ;
dahje Cc ;
dahjege Cc ;
dahege Cc ;
dehe Cc ;
dehege Cc ;
ele Cc ;
elege Cc ;
ele% ge Cc ;
muhto Cc ;
vai Cc ;

LEXICON Cc

 +CC:0 # ;


! Interjection
! ============


LEXICON Ij

 +Interj:0 # ;





! Particles
! =========


LEXICON Particles
abai pcle ;
ahteson pcle ;
aitto pcle ;
almma pcle ;
ama pcle ;
amal pcle ;
amat pcle ;
amma pcle ;
ammahal pcle ;
ammal pcle ;
ammat pcle ;
ammes pcle ;
appason pcle ;
ba pcle ;
bat pcle ;
!be pcle ; only in Finland as clitic?
dat pcle ;
eaigga pcle ;
eiddo pcle ;
eigga pcle ;
eitto pcle ;
galahal pcle ;
galahan pcle ;
galhal pcle ;
ge pcle ;
ges pcle ;
gis pcle ;
go pcle ;
goit:gojt pcle ;
goitge:gojtge pcle ;
goittot:gojttot pcle ;
goittotge:gojttotge pcle ;
hás pcle ;
hal pcle ;
han pcle ;
na pcle ;
naj pcle ;
no pcle ;
noa pcle ;
son pcle ;

LEXICON pcle
+Pcle:0 # ;
! Perhaps this should be opened to  a direction to K
! and all the ge versions should be removed.
! (i.e. only goit, not goitge). This errouneously
! permits gege, goge, etc., though, and we thus leave
! things as they are.



! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON declindef
eará+Pron+Indef:eará               indef-a-even-v ;
iežá+Pron+Indef:iežá                   indef-a-even-v ;
uhccánaš+Pron+Indef:uhccánažž       indef-a-even-c ;
unnánaš+Pron+Indef:unnánažž           indef-a-even-c ;
ea0nas+Pron+Indef:eatnas           indef-a-uneven ;
ea0naš+Pron+Indef:eatnaš               indef-a-uneven ;
muhtin+Pron+Indef:muhtim           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
muhtun+Pron+Indef:muhtum           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
muhtun+Pron+Indef:muhtom           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
uhccán+Pron+Indef:uhccán       indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
unnán+Pron+Indef:unnán           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veháš+Pron+Indef:veháž           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
váháš+Pron+Indef:váháž           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veaháš+Pron+Indef:veaháž           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás          indefattr ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmásX2      indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás          indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmásX2      indefdeclpluneven-n ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmási          indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
nuppát+Pron+Indef:nuppád              indefsg-a-uneven ;
duobbá+Pron+Indef:duobbá              indef-a-even-v ;
dábbá+Pron+Indef:dábbá              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juobbá              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá#goabbá+Pron+Indef: JUOBBAGOABBA ;
nubbi+Pron+Indef:nubbi             indef-a-even-v ;
juohkehaš+Pron+Indef:juohkehažž         indef-a-even-c ;
ollut+Pron+Indef:ollu           indefdeclpleven ;
olut+Pron+Indef:olu           indefdeclpleven ;
moanat+Pron+Indef:moana           indefdeclpleven ;
buohkat+Pron+Indef:buohka       indefdeclpleven ;
gaikkat+Pron+Indef:gajkka       indefdeclpleven ;
goappašagat+Pron+Indef:goappašaga  indefdeclpleven ;
ollugat+Pron+Indef:ollug       indu-pl-gahpir ;
oallugat+Pron+Indef:oallug       indu-pl-gahpir ;
olugat+Pron+Indef:olug           indu-pl-gahpir ;
gal0lis+Pron+Indef:gal'lis       indefdecluneven ;
olus+Pron+Indef:olus           indefdecluneven ;
ol0lus+Pron+Indef:ol'lus           indefdecluneven ; ! substandard
soamis+Pron+Indef:soamis       indefdecluneven ;
eambbos+Pron+Indef:eambbos       indefdecluneven ;
eambbogat+Prop+Indef:eambbog       indu-pl-gahpir ;
guoktasat+Pron+Indef:guoktas       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappašat+Pron+Indef:goappaš       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappešat+Pron+Indef:goappeš        indu-pl-gahpir ;
eanebut+Pron+Indef:eanebu       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemusX2       indefdeclpluneven-n ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemusiX2       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eatnagat+Pron+Indef:eatnag       indu-pl-gahpir ;
galládat+Pron+Indef:gallád       indu-pl-gahpir ;
LEXICON Subjunction
ahte Cs ;
aht Cs ; !SUB
amas Cs ;
danin% go Cs ;
daningo Cs ;
danne% go Cs ;
das% go Cs ;
dasgo Cs ;
dasságo Cs ;
de Cs ;
dego Cs ;
dušše% go Cs ;
duššego Cs ;
earágo Cs ; ! The Cs tag is not ideal, CS is a barrier in many rules.
earetgo Cs ;
earretgo Cs ;
ehte Cs ;
geardde Cs ;
gearddi Cs ;
go Cs ;
nu% guhkásgo Cs ; ! Deviant, "guhkás go" expected
jes Cs ;
jis Cs ;
joas  Cs ;
jos Cs ;
josba Cs ;
juos Cs ;
juos% go Cs ;
juosgo Cs ;
jus Cs ;
maŋŋágo:maŋ'ŋágo Cs ; !SUB
maŋŋágo Cs ;
maŋŋel% go Cs ;
maŋŋelgo Cs ;
maŋŋil% go Cs ;
maŋŋilgo Cs ;
maŋŋá% go Cs ;
mo Cs ; !XXX
mov Cs ; !XXX
movt  Cs ; !XXX
muhte Cs ;
nugo Cs ;
ovdal% go Cs ;
ovdalgo Cs ;
plus Cs ;
seammaládjego Cs ;
seammaláhkaigo Cs ;
seammás% go Cs ;
sehke Cs ; !Not in corpus.
vái Cs ;
váikko Cs ;
vai Cs ;
vaikke Cs ;
vaikko Cs ;
vuoikke Cs ; !SUB
váikke Cs ;
LEXICON Interjection
aa Ij ;
a-a Ij ;
á-a Ij ;
ádje-da Ij ;
ái Ij ;
ámen Ij ;
ámmen Ij ;
ámen Ij ;
aamen Ij ;
amen Ij ;
ámmozan Ij ;
áš Ij ;
báv Ij ;
bea Ij ;
bešš Ij ;
bevggo-be Ij ;
bis-bis Ij ;
bla Ij ;
bodde Ij ;
buorat Ij ;
buorát Ij ;
bures Ij ;
buse-buse Ij ;
cecce Ij ;
ci Ij ;
cilo Ij ;
cuoh:cuoh3 Ij ;
cuš Ij ;
cyš Ij ;
cys Ij ;
dan#heakka Ij ;
dáhkka Ij ;
dearvva Ij ;
dua Ij ;
fánten Ij ;
ficce Ij ;
fihcce Ij ;
fuoi Ij ;
fuos Ij ;
gáppo-gáppo Ij ;
gea Ij ;
geah:geah3 Ij ;
giš Ij ;
Gucco Ij ;
gus Ij ;
halleluja Ij ;
hái Ij ;
he-hei Ij ;
hei Ij ;
hivás Ij ;
hohoh:hohoh3 Ij ;
hohoi Ij ;
hoi Ij ;
huh:huh3 Ij ;
huf Ij ;
hurá Ij ;
hurádis Ij ;
hyš Ij ;
iihii Ij ;
iš Ij ;
já Ij ;
jájáh:jájáh3 Ij ;
já-já Ij ;
jo Ij ;
jojoh:jojoh3 Ij ;
jua Ij ;
juo Ij ;
juo Ij ;
kyš-kyš Ij ;
ma-maid Ij ;
maid:majd Ij ;
morá Ij ;
oh:oh3 Ij ;
oho Ij ;
ohoi Ij ;
puh:puh3 Ij ;
skole Ij ;
skolle Ij ;
skol Ij ;
šlečč Ij ;
uh Ij ;
uhm Ij ;
uš Ij ;
voi Ij ;
vooi Ij ;
vuoi Ij ;
yeh Ij ;
